District of Columbia statutes.
34-2403.02

Use of Potomac water for mechanical and manufacturing purposes.

The use of Potomac water for mechanical and manufacturing purposes, or for private fountains, street and pavement washers, shall be allowed only when, in the opinion of the Chief of Engineers, it will not be detrimental to the general distribution of water in the District of Columbia.

R.S., D.C., § 215
Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 319, ch. 145
1981 Ed., § 43-1510.
1973 Ed., § 43-1508.